North Carolina statutes. Chapter 15. Criminal Procedure.
Article 16. Trial before Justice. [Repealed]

§§ 15-156 through 15-158.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1286, s. 26.

§ 15-159.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 711, s. 33.

Cross References.

For provisions as to commitment to Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety or local confinement facility, see

G.S. 15A-1352

, 15A-1353.

For provisions as to post-trial relief, see

G.S. 15A-1411

through 15A-1422.

§§ 15-160,
15-161.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1286, s. 26.